fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Cardio > Machines de cardiotraining > Vélos d’appartement: Mini vélos d’appartement; Vélos d’appartement semi-allongés; Vélos d’appartement de spinning; Vélos d’exercice droits
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Cardio > Aparate pentru cardio > Biciclete statice: Biciclete statice mini; Biciclete statice înclinate; Biciclete statice pentru spinning; Biciclete statice verticale
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Konditionsträning > Maskiner för kardioträning > Träningscyklar: Miniträningscyklar; Liggande träningscyklar; Spinningträningscyklar; Upprätta träningscyklar
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Cardio > Cardio-maskiner > Motionscykler: Minimotionscykler; Liggende motionscykler; Spinningcykler; Opretstående motionscykler
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Ασκήσεις καρδιοαναπνευστικής άσκησης > Μηχανήματα καρδιοαναπνευστικής άσκησης > Ποδήλατα γυμναστικής: Μίνι ποδήλατα γυμναστικής; Ποδήλατα γυμναστικής με ανάκλιση; Στατικά ποδήλατα γυμναστικής (spinning); Όρθια ποδήλατα γυμναστικής
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Кардио тренировки > Уреди за кардио тренировки > Велоергометри: Минивелоергометри; Хоризонтални велоергометри; Спининг байкове; Вертикални велоергометри
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Kardio > Trenažéry > Rotopedy: Mini rotopedy; Recumbenty; Spinningová kola; Rotopedy
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Kardio > Kardio naprave > Sobna kolesa: Mini sobna kolesa; Ležeča sobna kolesa; Spinning sobna kolesa; Pokončna sobna kolesa
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Cardio > Aparelhos para exercícios aeróbicos > Bicicletas ergométricas: Mini bicicletas ergométricas; Bicicletas ergométricas reclináveis; Bicicletas ergométricas spin; Bicicletas ergométricas verticais
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Cardio > Cardio machine > Cyclette: Mini cyclette; Cyclette reclinate; Cyclette da spinning; Cyclette verticali
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Кардиотренировки > Кардиотренажеры > Велотренажеры: Мини-велотренажеры; Горизонтальные велотренажеры; Спин-байки; Вертикальные велотренажеры
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 有氧运动 > 有氧运动机 > 健身自行车: 迷你健身车; 卧式健身车; 旋转式健身车; 直立式健身车
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 카디오 > 심장 강화 운동 기구 > 실내 운동용 자전거: 미니 실내 운동용 자전거; 좌식 실내 운동용 자전거; 실내 운동용 스핀 바이크; 직립형 실내 운동용 자전거
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Trening kardio > Sprzęt kardio > Rowery treningowe: Mini rowery treningowe; Leżące rowery treningowe; Rowery treningowe do intensywnego treningu; Pionowe rowery treningowe
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Cardio > Cardioapparaten > Hometrainers: Minihometrainers; Ligfiets-hometrainers; Spinning-hometrainers; Staande hometrainers
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Cardio > Cardio Machines > Exercise Bikes: Mini Exercise Bikes; Recumbent Exercise Bikes; Spin Exercise Bikes; Upright Exercise Bikes
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > คาร์ดิโอ > เครื่องคาดิโอ > จักรยานออกกำลังกาย: จักรยานออกกำลังกายขนาดเล็ก; จักรยานออกกำลังกายแบบเอนปั่น; จักรยานออกกำลังกายแบบสปิน; จักรยานออกกำลังกายแบบนั่งหลังตรง
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Kardiotreniruotės > Kardiotreniruokliai > Dviračių treniruokliai: Dviračių minitreniruokliai; Dviračių treniruokliai su atlošu; Realistiški dviračių treniruokliai; Vertikalūs dviračių treniruokliai
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Kardiyo > Kardiyo Makineleri > Egzersiz Bisikletleri: Mini Kondisyon Bisikletleri; Yatar Kondisyon Bisikletleri; Spin Kondisyon Bisikletleri; Dik Kondisyon Bisikletleri
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Cardiofitness > Máquinas de cardiofitness > Bicicletas de exercício: Minibicicletas de exercício; Bicicletas de exercício reclinadas; Bicicletas de spinning; Bicicletas de exercício verticais
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Bài tập dành cho tim > Máy tập cardio > Xe đạp tập thể dục: Xe đạp tập thể dục mini; Xe đạp tập thể dục nằm nghiêng; Xe đạp tập thể dục quay tròn; Xe đạp tập thể dục thẳng đứng
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Kardió > Kardiógépek > Szobakerékpárok: Mini szobakerékpárok; Fekvő szobakerékpárok; Forgó szobakerékpárok; Álló szobakerékpárok
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Kestävyysurheilu > Kuntoilulaitteet kestävyysharjoitteluun > Kuntopyörät: Minikuntopyörät; Nojakuntopyörät; Spinning-pyörät; Pystykuntopyörät
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > 有酸素運動 > フィットネスマシン > エアロバイク: ミニエアロバイク; リカンベントエアロバイク; スピンバイク; アップライトエアロバイク
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 心肺運動 > 心肺訓練器材 > 腳踏健身車: 迷你健身車; 握式健身車; 飛輪健身車; 立式健身車
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Cardio > Cardiogeräte > Heimtrainer: Mini-Heimtrainer; Liegeheimtrainer; Spinning-Heimtrainer; Aufrechte Heimtrainer
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Cardio > Máquinas de cardio > Bicicletas estáticas: Mini bicicletas estáticas; Bicicletas estáticas reclinadas; Bicicletas estáticas giratorias; Bicicletas estáticas verticales
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Kardio cvičenie > Stroje na kardio tréning > Rotopedy: Mini rotopedy; Recumbenty; Rotačné rotopedy; Rotopedy v stoji
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Kardio > Kardio sprave > Sobni bicikli: Mini sobni bicikli; Ležeći sobni bicikli; Spinning bicikli; Uspravni sobni bicikli
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Kardio > Kardiomaskiner > Ergometersykler: Mini-ergometersykler; Sittende ergometersykler; Spinningsykler; Stående ergometersykler